Missouri, session 2026, SB1267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 197.1040 and 197.1045,
to read as follows:
197.1040. For purposes of this section, unless the
context otherwise requires, the following terms mean:
(1) "Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services", the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in the United
States Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) "Collection action", any of the following actions
taken with respect to a debt for items and services that
were purchased from or provided to a patient by a hospital
on a date during which the hospital was not in material
compliance with hospital price transparency laws:
(a) Attempting to collect a debt from a patient or
patient guarantor by referring the debt, directly or
indirectly, to a debt collector, a collection agency, or
other third party retained by or on behalf of the hospital;
(b) Suing the patient or patient guarantor or
enforcing an arbitration or mediation clause in any hospital

SB 1267 2
documents, including contracts, agreements, statements, or
bills; or
(c) Directly or indirectly causing a report to be made
to a consumer reporting agency;
(3) "Collection agency":
(a) Any:
a. Person who engages in a business, the principal
purpose of which is the collection of debts; or
b. Person who:
(i) Regularly collects or attempts to collect,
directly or indirectly, debts owed or due or asserted to be
owed or due to another;
(ii) Takes assignment of debts for collection purposes;
(iii) Directly or indirectly solicits for collection
debts owed or due or asserted to be owed or due to another;
or
(iv) Collects debts for the office of administration;
(b) Does not include:
a. Any officer or employee of a creditor while, in the
name of the creditor, collecting debts for such creditor;
b. Any person while acting as a collection agency for
another person, both of whom are related by common ownership
or affiliated by corporate control, if the person acting as
a collection agency does so only for creditors to whom it is
so related or affiliated and if the principal business of
the person is not the collection of debts;
c. Any officer or employee of the United States or any
state to the extent that collecting or attempting to collect
any debt is in the performance of the officer's or
employee's official duties;

SB 1267 3
d. Any person while serving or attempting to serve
legal process on any other person in connection with the
judicial enforcement of any debt;
e. Any person collecting or attempting to collect any
debt owed or due or asserted to be owed or due to another to
the extent that:
(i) The activity is incidental to a bona fide
fiduciary obligation or a bona fide escrow arrangement;
(ii) The activity concerns a debt that was extended by
the person;
(iii) The activity concerns a debt that was not in
default at the time it was obtained by the person; or
(iv) The activity concerns a debt obtained by the
person as a secured party in a commercial credit transaction
involving the creditor; or
f. Any person whose principal business is the making
of loans or the servicing of debt not in default and who
acts as a loan correspondent, seller, and servicer for the
owner, or holder of a debt that is secured by a deed of
trust on real property, regardless of whether the debt is
also secured by an interest in personal property;
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of
this subdivision to the contrary, the term "collection
agency" includes any person who, in the process of
collecting the person's own debts, uses another name that
would indicate that a third person is collecting or
attempting to collect such debts;
(4) "Consumer reporting agency", any person who, for
monetary fees or dues or on a cooperative nonprofit basis,
regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of
assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or
other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing

SB 1267 4
consumer reports to third parties. The term "consumer
reporting agency" includes any person defined in 15 U.S.C.
Section 1681a(f) and any consumer credit reporting agency
defined in section 407.1380. The term "consumer reporting
agency" does not include any business entity that provides
only check verification or check guarantee services;
(5) "Debt", any obligation or alleged obligation of a
consumer to pay moneys arising out of a transaction,
regardless of whether the obligation has been reduced to
judgment. The term "debt" does not include a debt for
business, investment, commercial, or agricultural purposes
or a debt incurred by a business;
(6) "Debt collector", any person employed or engaged
by a collection agency to perform the collection of debts
owed or due or asserted to be owed or due to another;
(7) "Hospital", a hospital:
(a) Licensed under this chapter; or
(b) Approved by the department of health and senior
services as meeting the standards established for licensing
a hospital in this state;
(8) "Hospital price transparency laws", Section
100 2718(e) of the Public Health Service Act, as amended, and
101 rules adopted by the United States Department of Health and
102 Human Services implementing Section 2718(e);
103 (9) "Items and services" or "items or services", items
104 and services as defined in 45 CFR 180.20.
197.1045. 1. On and after August 28, 2026, a hospital
that is not in material compliance with hospital price
transparency laws on the date that items or services are
purchased from, or provided to a patient by, the hospital
shall not initiate or pursue a collection action against the

SB 1267 5
patient or patient guarantor for a debt owed for the items
or services.
2. If a patient believes that a hospital was not in
material compliance with hospital price transparency laws on
a date on or after August 28, 2026, that items or services
were purchased by or provided to the patient, and the
hospital takes a collection action against the patient or
patient guarantor, the patient or patient guarantor may file
suit to determine if the hospital was materially out of
compliance with the hospital price transparency laws and
rules and regulations on the date of service and if the
noncompliance is related to the items or services. The
hospital shall not take a collection action against the
patient or patient guarantor while the lawsuit is pending.
3. A hospital that has been found by a judge or jury,
considering compliance standards issued by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, to be materially out of
compliance with hospital price transparency laws and rules
and regulations:
(1) Shall refund the payer any amount of the debt the
payer has paid and shall pay a penalty to the patient or
patient guarantor in an amount equal to the total amount of
the debt;
(2) Shall dismiss or cause to be dismissed any court
action with prejudice and pay any attorney's fees and costs
incurred by the patient or patient guarantor relating to the
action; and
(3) Remove or cause to be removed from the patient's
or patient guarantor's credit report any report made to a
consumer reporting agency relating to the debt.
4. Nothing in this section:

SB 1267 6
(1) Prohibits a hospital from billing a patient,
patient guarantor, or third-party payer, including a health
insurer, for items or services provided to the patient; or
(2) Requires a hospital to refund any payment made to
the hospital for items or services provided to the patient,
so long as no collection action is taken in violation of
this section.
✓